Missouri, session 2026, SB1777.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 161, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 161.1160, to read as
follows:
161.1160. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Charter school", includes only those charter
schools established under chapter 160 that satisfy the
following criteria:
(a) The charter of such charter school has not
previously been revoked;
(b) For the three school years immediately preceding
the school year of the proposed school transformation, the
charter school has an annual performance report score
consistent with an accreditation status of accredited
without provision; and
(c) The charter school had no significant findings on
the prior year annual financial audit;
(2) "Commissioner", the commissioner of elementary and
secondary education;

SB 1777 2
(3) "School district", includes only those school
districts that are determined to be in the bottom five
percent of scores on the annual performance report and those
school districts whose most recent annual performance report
score is consistent with an accreditation status of
provisionally accredited or unaccredited.
2. Subject to approval by the state board of
education, a school district board of directors or the
commissioner, acting as a school district board of
directors, may enter into a performance-based contract with
either of the following entities to operate a designated
public school as a "Public School Transformation Campus":
(1) The governing body of a charter school; or
(2) A nonprofit education management organization or
other entity, as approved by the state board of education.
3. A school district that contracts with an entity
identified in subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 2 of this
section to operate a public school transformation campus
shall be eligible for an exemption from the provisions of
sections 161.1080 to 161.1130, sections 162.081 to 162.083,
section 162.085, and sections 167.895 to 167.898.
4. A school district proposing to enter into a
contract under this section shall notify the commissioner of
the school district's intent to enter into the contract.
The state board of education shall establish by rule the
procedures for a school district to notify the commissioner,
including:
(1) The time period within which the notification is
required before the school year in which the proposed
contract would take effect; and

SB 1777 3
(2) If necessary, the charter school governing board
or other entity to which a school district shall submit
information as required.
5. The commissioner shall notify a school district
whether the proposed contract is approved not later than
sixty days after the date the state board of education and
the commissioner received notice of the proposed contract
and all information required by the commissioner to be
submitted has been received.
6. This section does not prohibit a contract between a
school district and another entity for the provision of
services for a public school within the school district,
including without limitation a contract for food services.
7. The department shall encourage charter school
operators to enter into contracts with school districts to
establish public school transformation campuses.
8. For purposes of accountability during the first two
school years of operation, a public school transformation
campus shall be:
(1) Awarded with an alternate performance status,
which shall be established and defined by the state board of
education;
(2) Exempt from any sanction or action against the
public school transformation campus for failure to satisfy
academic performance standards; and
(3) Publicly signaled as a public school
transformation campus.
9. Following the first two years of transformation,
the state board of education shall continue to evaluate and
assign all performance ratings received by other public
schools within a school district to the public school
transformation campus.

SB 1777 4
10. The department may provide, through state and
federal funds where allowable, financial incentives to
support transformations under this section.
11. The state board of education shall promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section. Any rule
or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓